dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX GB Y 69
SFX GB ti l .
SFX GB egti gla .
SFX GB egti glo .
SFX GB egti gli .
SFX GB egti gų .
SFX GB egti žem .
SFX GB egti žeš .
SFX GB egti že .
SFX GB egti žemȯ .
SFX GB egti žete .
SFX GB egti gųt .
SFX GB egti žeh .
SFX GB egti žeše .
SFX GB egti žehmȯ .
SFX GB egti žeste .
SFX GB egti žehų .
SFX GB egti ži .
SFX GB egti žimȯ .
SFX GB egti žite .
SFX GB egti gųći .
SFX GB egti gųćego .
SFX GB egti gųćemu .
SFX GB egti gųćim .
SFX GB egti gųćem .
SFX GB egti gųćih .
SFX GB egti gųćimi .
SFX GB egti gųća .
SFX GB egti gųće .
SFX GB egti žemy .
SFX GB egti žemogo .
SFX GB egti žemomu .
SFX GB egti žemym .
SFX GB egti žemom .
SFX GB egti žemo .
SFX GB egti žema .
SFX GB egti žemų .
SFX GB egti žemoj .
SFX GB egti žemojų .
SFX GB egti žemi .
SFX GB egti žeme .
SFX GB egti žemyh .
SFX GB egti žemym .
SFX GB egti žemymi .
SFX GB egti žemo .
SFX GB ti ši .
SFX GB ti ša .
SFX GB ti še .
SFX GB egti ženy .
SFX GB egti ženogo .
SFX GB egti ženomu .
SFX GB egti ženym .
SFX GB egti ženom .
SFX GB egti ženi .
SFX GB egti žene .
SFX GB egti ženyh .
SFX GB egti ženymi .
SFX GB egti žena .
SFX GB egti ženų .
SFX GB egti ženoj .
SFX GB egti ženojų .
SFX GB egti ženo .
SFX GB egti žeńje/xPxE .
SFX GB egti žeńja/xPxE .
SFX GB egti žeńju/xPxE .
SFX GB egti žeńjem/xPxE .
SFX GB egti ženij/xPxE .
SFX GB egti žeńjam/xPxE .
SFX GB egti žeńjami/xPxE .
SFX GB egti žeńjah/xPxE .

SFX GC Y 32
SFX GC ti l .
SFX GC ti la .
SFX GC ti lo .
SFX GC ti li .
SFX GC ti 0 .
SFX GC ųti em .
SFX GC ųti eš .
SFX GC ųti e .
SFX GC ųti emȯ .
SFX GC ųti ete .
SFX GC i 0 .
SFX GC ti h .
SFX GC ti še .
SFX GC ti hmȯ .
SFX GC ti ste .
SFX GC ti hų .
SFX GC ųti i .
SFX GC ųti imȯ .
SFX GC ųti ite .
SFX GC ti ći .
SFX GC ti ća .
SFX GC ti će .
SFX GC ųti emy .
SFX GC ųti ema .
SFX GC ųti emo .
SFX GC ti vši .
SFX GC ti vša .
SFX GC ti vše .
SFX GC i y .
SFX GC i a .
SFX GC i o .
SFX GC ti ťje .

SFX GD Y 17
SFX GD 0 0/xPxE .
SFX GD e e/xPxBxO .
SFX GD e a/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 sa/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 se/xPxE .
SFX GD e 0 .
SFX GD 0 s/xPxE .
SFX GD e u/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 si/xPxE .
SFX GD e ah/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 sah/xPxE .
SFX GD e am/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 sam/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 m/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 sem/xPxE .
SFX GD e ami/xPxE .
SFX GD 0 sami/xPxE .

SFX GE Y 60
SFX GE ti l .
SFX GE ti la .
SFX GE ti lo .
SFX GE ti li .
SFX GE uti ovų .
SFX GE uti ovem .
SFX GE uti oveš .
SFX GE uti ove .
SFX GE uti ovemȯ .
SFX GE uti ovete .
SFX GE uti ovųt .
SFX GE ti h .
SFX GE ti še .
SFX GE ti hmȯ .
SFX GE ti ste .
SFX GE ti hų .
SFX GE uti ovi .
SFX GE uti ovimȯ .
SFX GE uti ovite .
SFX GE uti ovųći .
SFX GE uti ovųćego .
SFX GE uti ovųćemu .
SFX GE uti ovųćim .
SFX GE uti ovųćem .
SFX GE uti ovųćih .
SFX GE uti ovųćimi .
SFX GE uti ovųća .
SFX GE uti ovųće .
SFX GE uti ovemy .
SFX GE uti ovemogo .
SFX GE uti ovemomu .
SFX GE uti ovemym .
SFX GE uti ovemom .
SFX GE uti ovemo .
SFX GE uti ovema .
SFX GE uti ovemų .
SFX GE uti ovemoj .
SFX GE uti ovemojų .
SFX GE uti ovemi .
SFX GE uti oveme .
SFX GE uti ovemyh .
SFX GE uti ovemym .
SFX GE uti ovemymi .
SFX GE uti ovemo .
SFX GE ti vši .
SFX GE ti všego .
SFX GE ti všemu .
SFX GE ti všim .
SFX GE ti všem .
SFX GE ti vših .
SFX GE ti všimi .
SFX GE ti vša .
SFX GE ti všų .
SFX GE ti všej .
SFX GE ti všejų .
SFX GE ti vše .
SFX GE i y .
SFX GE i a .
SFX GE i o .
SFX GE ti ťje .

SFX GF Y 21
SFX GF 0 0/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX GF ȯt t/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt ty/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 y/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt ta/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 a/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt tov/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt tu/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 u/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt tah/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt tam/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 am/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt tom/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 om/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt tami/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX GF ȯt te/xPxE .
SFX GF 0 e/xPxE .

SFX GG Y 12
SFX GG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX GG 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX GG en ėn/xPxE .
SFX GG en ni/xPxE .
SFX GG en na/xPxE .
SFX GG en nov/xPxE .
SFX GG en nu/xPxE .
SFX GG en nah/xPxE .
SFX GG en nam/xPxE .
SFX GG en nom/xPxE .
SFX GG en nami/xPxE .
SFX GG en ne/xPxE .

SFX GH Y 11
SFX GH 0 0/xPxE .
SFX GH 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX GH yŕ iŕ/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕe/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕa/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕev/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕu/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕah/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕam/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕem/xPxE .
SFX GH yŕ iŕami/xPxE .

SFX GI Y 60
SFX GI ti l .
SFX GI ti la .
SFX GI ti lo .
SFX GI ti li .
SFX GI råti oŕų .
SFX GI råti oŕem .
SFX GI råti oŕeš .
SFX GI råti oŕe .
SFX GI råti oŕemȯ .
SFX GI råti oŕete .
SFX GI råti oŕųt .
SFX GI ti h .
SFX GI ti še .
SFX GI ti hmȯ .
SFX GI ti ste .
SFX GI ti hų .
SFX GI råti oŕi .
SFX GI råti oŕimȯ .
SFX GI råti oŕite .
SFX GI råti oŕųći .
SFX GI råti oŕųćego .
SFX GI råti oŕųćemu .
SFX GI råti oŕųćim .
SFX GI råti oŕųćem .
SFX GI råti oŕųćih .
SFX GI råti oŕųćimi .
SFX GI råti oŕųća .
SFX GI råti oŕųće .
SFX GI råti oŕemy .
SFX GI råti oŕemogo .
SFX GI råti oŕemomu .
SFX GI råti oŕemym .
SFX GI råti oŕemom .
SFX GI råti oŕemo .
SFX GI råti oŕema .
SFX GI råti oŕemų .
SFX GI råti oŕemoj .
SFX GI råti oŕemojų .
SFX GI råti oŕemi .
SFX GI råti oŕeme .
SFX GI råti oŕemyh .
SFX GI råti oŕemym .
SFX GI råti oŕemymi .
SFX GI råti oŕemo .
SFX GI ti vši .
SFX GI ti všego .
SFX GI ti všemu .
SFX GI ti všim .
SFX GI ti všem .
SFX GI ti vših .
SFX GI ti všimi .
SFX GI ti vša .
SFX GI ti všų .
SFX GI ti všej .
SFX GI ti všejų .
SFX GI ti vše .
SFX GI i y .
SFX GI i a .
SFX GI i o .
SFX GI ti ťje .

SFX GJ Y 21
SFX GJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX GJ ȯr r/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr ry/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 y/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr ra/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 a/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr rov/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr ru/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 u/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr rah/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr ram/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 am/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr rom/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 om/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr rami/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX GJ ȯr re/xPxE .
SFX GJ 0 e/xPxE .

SFX GK Y 27
SFX GK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX GK si śi/xPxE .
SFX GK si śe/xPxE .
SFX GK si śa/xPxE .
SFX GK si śego/xBxPxE .
SFX GK si śų/xPxE .
SFX GK si śej/xPxE .
SFX GK si śem/xPxE .
SFX GK si śemu/xPxE .
SFX GK si śim/xPxE .
SFX GK si śejų/xPxE .
SFX GK si śih/xPxE .
SFX GK si śimi/xPxE .
SFX GK si śejši/zz .
SFX GK si śejšego/zz .
SFX GK si śejšemu/zz .
SFX GK si śejšim/zz .
SFX GK si śejšem/zz .
SFX GK si śejše/zz .
SFX GK si śejša/zz .
SFX GK si śejšų/zz .
SFX GK si śejšej/zz .
SFX GK si śejšejų/zz .
SFX GK si śejših/zz .
SFX GK si śejšim/zz .
SFX GK si śejšimi/zz .
SFX GK si śeje/zz .

SFX GL Y 78
SFX GL ti l .
SFX GL ti la .
SFX GL ti lo .
SFX GL ti li .
SFX GL astati åstų .
SFX GL astati åstem .
SFX GL astati åsteš .
SFX GL astati åste .
SFX GL astati åstemȯ .
SFX GL astati åstete .
SFX GL astati åstųt .
SFX GL ti h .
SFX GL ti še .
SFX GL ti hmȯ .
SFX GL ti ste .
SFX GL ti hų .
SFX GL astati åsti .
SFX GL astati åstimȯ .
SFX GL astati åstite .
SFX GL astati åstųći .
SFX GL astati åstųćego .
SFX GL astati åstųćemu .
SFX GL astati åstųćim .
SFX GL astati åstųćem .
SFX GL astati åstųćih .
SFX GL astati åstųćimi .
SFX GL astati åstųća .
SFX GL astati åstųće .
SFX GL astati åstomy .
SFX GL astati åstomogo .
SFX GL astati åstomomu .
SFX GL astati åstomym .
SFX GL astati åstomom .
SFX GL astati åstomo .
SFX GL astati åstoma .
SFX GL astati åstomų .
SFX GL astati åstomoj .
SFX GL astati åstomojų .
SFX GL astati åstomi .
SFX GL astati åstome .
SFX GL astati åstomyh .
SFX GL astati åstomym .
SFX GL astati åstomymi .
SFX GL astati åstomo .
SFX GL ti vši .
SFX GL ti všego .
SFX GL ti všemu .
SFX GL ti všim .
SFX GL ti všem .
SFX GL ti vših .
SFX GL ti všimi .
SFX GL ti vša .
SFX GL ti všų .
SFX GL ti všej .
SFX GL ti všejų .
SFX GL ti vše .
SFX GL ti ny .
SFX GL ti nogo .
SFX GL ti nomu .
SFX GL ti nym .
SFX GL ti nom .
SFX GL ti ni .
SFX GL ti ne .
SFX GL ti nyh .
SFX GL ti nymi .
SFX GL ti na .
SFX GL ti nų .
SFX GL ti noj .
SFX GL ti nojų .
SFX GL ti no .
SFX GL ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX GL ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX GL ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX GL ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX GL ti nij/xPxE .
SFX GL ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX GL ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX GL ti ńjah/xPxE .
