dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
obžegti/GB
ogluhnųti/GC
oje/GD
opluti/GE
osȯt/GF
oven/GG
pancyŕ/GH
råzpråti/GI
råzžegti/GB
vihȯr/GJ
žegti/GB
sȯžegti/GB
zažegti/GB
seksi/GK
obrastati/GL
pråti/GI
izpluti/GE
odpluti/GE
popluti/GE
prěpluti/GE
pripluti/GE
pluti/GE
